Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑63] Effect on existing powers
of attorney. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, on [April 17,
2014]:

(1) This chapter shall apply to a power of attorney
created before, on, or after [April 17, 2014];

(2) This chapter shall apply to a judicial proceeding
concerning a power of attorney commenced on or after [April 17, 2014];

(3) This chapter shall apply to a judicial proceeding
concerning a power of attorney commenced before [April 17, 2014], unless the
court finds that application of a provision of this chapter would substantially
interfere with the effective conduct of the judicial proceeding or prejudice
the rights of a party, in which case that provision shall not apply and the
superseded law shall apply; and

(4) An act done before [April 17, 2014,] shall not be
affected by this chapter. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next